West Virginia, session 2026, SB489.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 2L. High School Educator FlexIbility Act of 2026. §18-2L-1. Short title. This article shall be known as "The High School Educator Flexibility Act."§18-2L-2. Definitions. For the purposes of this article:(1) "Approved professional learning" means a professional learning experience facilitated by an approved provider that satisfies all the following conditions:(A) The professional learning consists of no fewer than 30 clock hours of course-specific content and pedagogy instruction offered in one training or in sequenced modules completed within a single year;(B) Professional learning sessions are anchored to the provider’s course framework; (C) Professional learning sessions are facilitated by an individual the provider has formally vetted and then endorsed after completing the provider’s own faculty-development program and maintaining currency with the latest framework version; and(D) At the conclusion of professional learning, participants receive a dated certificate verifying the course title, hours earned, and the approved provider’s name; districts shall accept that certificate as proof of compliance, verifying the course title, hours earned, and the approved provider's name.(2) "Approved provider" means a U.S.-based, non-profit educational organization that publishes the curriculum framework for each high-quality course and requires each school offering the course to secure course authorization.(3) “Eligible educator” means a currently certified educator, including:(A) Teachers certified through alternative pathways; (B) Individuals holding a state-issued conditional teaching license who possess a bachelor’s or associate degree relevant to the high-quality course; or(C) Individuals who hold valid professional educator certificates but do not possess an endorsement for a specific subject area.(4) "High-quality course" means a high school course that:(A) Is designed and maintained in partnership with:(i) Accredited postsecondary institutions;(ii) Postsecondary institutions that are actively pursuing accreditation and have been verified for quality by the state board of education/state department of education; or(iii) Industry representatives.§18-2L-3 Establishment of course-specific teaching permit. (a) The Board of Education or West Virginia Commission for Professional Teaching Standards shall establish a course-specific teaching permit for eligible educators that:(1) Authorizes eligible educators to teach a high-quality course outside their formally endorsed certification area;(2) Is permanently issued to the educator upon completion of approved professional learning directly linked to the specific high-quality course content; and(3) Once earned by an educator, enables them to immediately begin classroom instruction.(b) Public school districts shall have the authority and flexibility to assign educators holding course-specific teaching permits to classrooms requiring such specialized instructional capacity.(c) The Board of Education shall maintain, and update on an annual basis, a list of:(1) Approved high-quality courses eligible for staffing through course-specific teaching permits;(2) Approved providers who facilitate approved professional learning experiences; and(3) Approved professional learning experiences.